Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 285B.551 is amended to read:
285B.551. (1) Pursuant to ORS  286A.560 to 286A.585, at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Oregon Business Development
Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds:
(a) To  provide financial and other assistance, including but not limited to loans and grants, to
municipalities,  ports  and other persons and entities in accordance with the laws governing use of
moneys in the Special Public Works Fund created  by ORS 285B.455, the Water Fund created by ORS
285B.563, the Safe Drinking Water Revolving  Loan Fund created by ORS 285A.213, the Oregon Port
Revolving Fund created by ORS 285A.708, the Brownfields Redevelopment Fund created by ORS
285A.188, the Oregon Business  Development Fund created by ORS 285B.092 and the Marine Navi-
gation Improvement Fund created by ORS 777.267.
(b) To fund Oregon’s share of the costs of the Columbia River channel deepening project.
(c) To fund Oregon’s share of the costs of studies and ecosystem  restoration projects in the
lower Columbia River estuary designed to improve habitat for  listed endangered or threatened spe-
cies of Columbia River anadromous salmonids.
(2) The use of lottery bond proceeds is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) The financial and  other assistance to municipalities, ports and other persons and entities
will assist in the establishment and expansion  of businesses in Oregon and in the construction, im-
provement and expansion of infrastructure, community  and port facilities and other facilities that
comprise the physical foundation for industrial and commercial activity and provide the  basic
framework for continued  and expanded economic opportunities and quality communities throughout
Oregon.
(b) The Columbia River channel deepening  project is necessary to allow newer, larger
steamships access to Oregon and Washington deep draft ports. A deeper shipping channel will  allow
the Columbia River to  continue as a world leader in agricultural exports and as a key trade corridor
for farms and businesses throughout Oregon and the region.
(c) Such financial  and other assistance to municipalities, ports and other persons and entities
and the deepening  of the Columbia River channel will therefore promote economic development
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 1
within this state, and thus the use of net proceeds derived from the operation of  the Oregon State
Lottery to pay debt service on lottery bonds  issued under this section to provide such financial and
other assistance to municipalities, ports and other persons and entities and  to pay a portion of the
costs of deepening the Columbia  River channel is an authorized use of state lottery funds under
section 4, Article XV of the Oregon Constitution, and ORS 461.510.
(d) The current lower Columbia River estuary habitat for listed endangered or  threatened spe-
cies  of  Columbia River anadromous salmonids could be improved through ecosystem restoration
projects. The use of the Oregon State Lottery to pay debt service on lottery bonds issued  under this
section to pay  for studying how the estuary could be improved and to pay for ecosystem restoration
projects are authorized uses of state lottery funds.
(3)(a) The aggregate  principal amount of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of
this section for financial and other assistance to municipalities, ports and other  persons and entities
may not  exceed the sum of [ $416,226,252] $436,226,252 and an additional amount estimated by the
State Treasurer to be  necessary to pay bond-related costs. The aggregate principal amount of lottery
bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section for the Columbia River channel  deepening
project may not exceed the sum  of [ $17.7] $32.7 million and an additional amount estimated by the
State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(b) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may not request the  issuance of lottery
bonds under subsection (1)(b) of this section  until the Director of the Oregon Business Development
Department determines  that a final environmental impact statement has been issued and a record
of decisions  has been submitted to Congress by the United States Army Corps of Engineers, Con-
gress has authorized the Columbia River channel deepening project, and  the Washington sponsors’
shares of the costs of the Columbia River channel deepening project have been committed.
(4) The net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(a)  and (b) of this section
shall be deposited in the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund, which is  hereby established in the
State Treasury separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Economic
Infrastructure Project Fund shall be credited  to the fund. All moneys in the Economic Infrastructure
Project  Fund  are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department for
any purpose for which  moneys in the Special Public Works Fund created by ORS 285B.455 may be
used, any  purpose for which moneys in the Water Fund created by ORS 285B.563 may be used, any
purpose for which moneys in the Safe Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund  created by ORS
285A.213 may be used, any purpose for which moneys in  the Oregon Port Revolving Fund created
by ORS 285A.708 may be used, any purpose for which moneys in the Brownfields Redevelopment
Fund created by ORS 285A.188 may be used, any purpose for  which moneys in the Oregon Business
Development Fund created by ORS 285B.092 may be used and any purpose for  which moneys in the
Marine Navigation  Improvement Fund created by ORS 777.267 may be used. The Director of the
Oregon Business Development Department shall allocate the moneys deposited in  the Economic
Infrastructure  Project  Fund for the purposes described in this subsection in accordance with the
priorities developed by the Oregon Business Development Commission in accordance with  ORS
285A.020. However, the director shall  transfer from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund and
deposit into the Channel  Deepening Account of the Marine Navigation Improvement Fund the pro-
ceeds of any lottery bonds sold to finance  a portion of the costs of the Columbia River channel
deepening project. Upon determining the relative  allocation of moneys deposited in the Economic
Infrastructure Project Fund among  the purposes described in this subsection, the director shall
transfer from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund, and deposit into each  of the other funds
described in this subsection, the amounts so allocated. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law
governing the funds described in this  subsection, the funds described in this subsection may be
credited with moneys transferred from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund by the director  in
accordance with this subsection.
(5) The aggregate principal amount of lottery bonds issued  pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this
section for the costs of studies and ecosystem restoration projects in  the lower Columbia River
estuary may not exceed the sum of $750,000 and an additional amount estimated by the  State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 2
Treasurer  to  be necessary to pay bond-related costs. The net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pur-
suant to subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be  deposited in the Oregon Business, Innovation and
Trade Fund created by ORS 285A.227 and may be  used only for the Oregon nonfederal share of
United States Army Corps of Engineers Columbia  River estuary projects authorized by Congress
prior to August 9, 2001. The director may  not request the issuance of lottery bonds under subsection
(1)(c) of  this section until Congress and Washington have authorized their respective shares of the
costs of the studies and ecosystem restoration projects in the lower Columbia River estuary.
(6) The proceeds of lottery bonds issued  pursuant to this section may be used only for the pur-
poses set forth in this section and for bond-related costs.
SECTION 2. (1) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $10 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for  deposit in the Levee Project Grant Fund es-
tablished in ORS 285B.421, for the purpose of providing grants under  ORS 285B.420 for levee
projects as defined in ORS 285B.410.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Levees are an integral part of the commercial and  industrial infrastructure of this
state; and
(b) The inspection, accreditation, certification and repair of levees  will promote economic
development within this state.
SECTION 3. (1) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $10 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the Brownfields Redevelopment
Fund established in ORS 285A.188 for the purposes described in ORS 285A.185 and 285A.188.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Redevelopment of industrial-zoned brownfields improves  the economy by returning
the assessed value of the properties to the real market value for property taxation purposes;
and
(b) The projects made  possible through increased funding to evaluate, clean up and re-
develop brownfields properties create jobs and further economic development.
SECTION 4.
(1) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the Department
of Education, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $15 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 3
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of Education  for deposit in the Connecting Oregon Schools Fund established in
ORS 276A.424, for providing matching funds for federal moneys received by school districts,
education service districts, public charter schools or a consortium that consists of  any
combination of school districts, education service districts and public charter schools, for the
purpose of providing broadband access to eligible education facilities in this state.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Assisting education facilities  with matching funds promotes expansion of access to
high-speed broadband for public education; and
(b) Providing financial assistance to education facilities for  building connections to
broadband infrastructure will enhance community efforts to promote economic growth.
SECTION 5.  Section 4, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009, as amended by  section 3, chapter 624,
Oregon Laws 2011, section 19, chapter 786,  Oregon Laws 2013, section 15, chapter 121, Oregon Laws
2014, section 37, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, section 4, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2016, section
7, chapter 748, Oregon  Laws 2017, section 7, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, section 4, chapter 682,
Oregon Laws 2021, and section 9, chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) Pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585, at  the request of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Housing and Community Services
Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds for the Housing and Community
Services Department to provide financial assistance to aid  in the acquisition,  stabilization,  reno-
vation or maintenance of properties with project-based federal rental assistance  contracts, public
housing undergoing  significant recapitalization or publicly supported housing as defined in ORS
456.250, or to preserve the affordability of manufactured dwelling parks.
(2) The use of lottery bond proceeds is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Individuals  who are at risk of homelessness or who otherwise pay a disproportionate share
of income for housing increase their potential  for self-sufficiency, and use proportionately fewer
community-funded resources when they are provided a stable housing environment.
(b) Having housing for at-risk populations is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic growth.
(3) The aggregate principal amount of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)  of this
section may not  exceed the amount of [ $108,801,718] $161,301,718 plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the  State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs as defined in ORS 286A.560.
SECTION 6.
(1) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Water Re-
sources Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $8 million in net  proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Water Resources Department for deposit in the  Water Supply Development Account estab-
lished in ORS  541.656, for providing grants or loans to evaluate, plan and develop in-stream
and out-of-stream statewide water development projects.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Having adequate drinking water systems, irrigation, drainage and healthy ecosystems
enhances community development and supports Oregon’s economic growth; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 4
(b) Assisting local governments to mitigate losses resulting  from reduced water supply
for irrigation and retirement of water  rights will enhance community efforts to facilitate and
promote economic growth.
SECTION 7. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the  request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $20 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund  established
under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distribution to  the Urban Flood Safety
and Water Quality District for levee system improvements  along the Columbia River from
Sauvie Island to the Sandy River in Troutdale.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Levees are an integral part of the commercial and  industrial infrastructure of this
state; and
(b) The inspection, accreditation, certification and repair of levees  will promote economic
development within this state.
SECTION 8. (1) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $10 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for  deposit in the Housing Infrastructure Project
Fund established under section 3, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2025  (Enrolled House Bill 3031),
for the purpose of providing grants to support key  community infrastructure investments
including transportation,  water, wastewater and stormwater infrastructure that will result
in affordable housing for households with very low, low or moderate income.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Individuals who are at risk of homelessness or who  otherwise pay a disproportionate
share of income for housing increase their potential for self-sufficiency, and use proportion-
ately fewer community-funded resources, when  they are provided with a stable housing en-
vironment; and
(b) Having housing for at-risk populations is  essential to Oregon’s healthy economic
growth.
SECTION 9.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at the  request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department and  subject to subsection (3) of this section, the State
Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS  286A.560 to 286A.585 in an
amount that produces $20 million in  net proceeds for the purposes described in subsection
(2) of this section, plus an additional amount  estimated by the State Treasurer to be neces-
sary to pay bond-related costs.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 5
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Business Development  Department for deposit in the Container Port Improvement
Fund established under section 10 of this 2025 Act for the purpose  of providing grants for
capital improvement projects to ensure that Oregon ports can  continue to provide container
service.
(3) Lottery bonds authorized under this  section may not be issued unless the Oregon
Business Development Department certifies that the Port of  Portland has executed an
agreement with an entity to operate the Terminal 6 container terminal.
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
financial and other assistance to municipalities, ports and other persons and  entities will
assist in the establishment and expansion of businesses in this state and  in the construction,
improvement and expansion  of infrastructure, community and port facilities and other fa-
cilities that comprise the physical foundation for industrial and commercial activity and
provide the basic framework for continued and expanded economic opportunities and  quality
communities throughout this state.
SECTION 10.
(1) The Container Port  Improvement Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Interest earned by the Container
Port Improvement Fund must be credited to the fund. The Container Port Improvement
Fund consists of moneys deposited in  the fund under section 9 of this 2025 Act and may in-
clude moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or  transferred to the fund by the Legislative
Assembly or otherwise and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated  to the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department for disbursement for the purposes set forth in section 9 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 11.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $10 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the  Industrial Site Loan Fund es-
tablished under section 12, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill 2411), for
projects related to industrial lands readiness activities.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
industrial development that provides new traded sector jobs reinforces the economies of local
and regional communities and contributes to Oregon’s economic recovery.
SECTION 12. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the City of
Beaverton, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585  in an amount that produces $3 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the City of Beaverton  for construction of an affordable
housing project for seniors.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 6
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) The  Meadowlark Senior Housing project will help to satisfy Oregon’s need for afford-
able housing;
(b) Having housing for at-risk populations is  essential to Oregon’s healthy economic
growth; and
(c) A severe shortage of affordable  housing exists in Oregon, and market indicators
demonstrate a growing gap between the supply of and the demand for affordable housing.
SECTION 13. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the Oregon Mu-
seum of Science and Industry, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pur-
suant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in  an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for
the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Oregon Museum  of Science and Industry for con-
struction of  OMSI District infrastructure to support affordable housing and mixed-use de-
velopment.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) The OMSI District project will help to satisfy Oregon’s need for affordable housing;
(b) Having housing for at-risk populations  is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic
growth; and
(c) A severe shortage of affordable housing exists  in Oregon, and market indicators
demonstrate a growing gap between the supply of and the demand for affordable housing.
SECTION 14.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Mid-
Willamette Family YMCA Veterans Housing, the State Treasurer is authorized to  issue lot-
tery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3.361 million
in net proceeds for the purposes described in subsection (2)  of this section, plus an additional
amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553,  for distribution to the Mid-Willamette Family YMCA Veterans Housing
for construction of an affordable housing project for veterans.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) The Albany Veterans Apartments project will help to satisfy  Oregon’s need for af-
fordable housing;
(b) Having housing for at-risk populations  is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic
growth; and
(c) A severe shortage of affordable housing exists  in Oregon, and market indicators
demonstrate a growing gap between the supply of and the demand for affordable housing.
SECTION 15. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585  in an amount that produces $2.861 million in net pro-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 7
ceeds for the purposes described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund  established
under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distribution to Morrow  County for the
Clean Water Consortium for promoting access to safe drinking water.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
safe drinking water is an integral  part of the commercial and industrial infrastructure of
this state, and essential for economic development.
SECTION 16. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Water Re-
sources Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to
ORS 286A.560  to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $6.5 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Water Resources Department for deposit in the Water Resources  Department Water Supply
Fund established in section 10, chapter 906, Oregon  Laws 2009, for distribution to the City
of Oregon City to construct the second Henrici Water Reservoir.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
water reservoirs are an integral part of the  commercial and industrial infrastructure of this
state, and essential for economic development.
SECTION 17. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $5 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for  deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon  Laws 2017, for distribution to the City of Estacada to
construct a new wastewater treatment plant.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
wastewater treatment plants are an  integral part of the commercial and industrial
infrastructure of this state, and improving wastewater treatment  will promote economic
development and watershed health.
SECTION 18. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $5 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for  deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under section  28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distribution to the City of Sandy to
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 8
construct a new wastewater  pipeline to connect to Gresham’s system for treatment and
discharge.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
wastewater treatment systems  are an integral part of the commercial and industrial
infrastructure of this state, and improving wastewater treatment  will promote economic
development and watershed health.
SECTION 19. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3.3 million  in net pro-
ceeds for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this  section, plus an additional amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund  established
under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distribution  to Oak Lodge Water Ser-
vices Authority to address inflow  and infiltration issues to reduce sewer system overflows
and reduce pressure on the district’s wastewater treatment plant.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
sewer and wastewater treatment systems are an integral part of the commercial  and indus-
trial infrastructure of this state,  and improving wastewater treatment will promote eco-
nomic development and watershed health.
SECTION 20. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $6 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for  deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for  distribution to the City of Eugene to
construct a wastewater collection system to prepare industrial land for development.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
wastewater treatment systems  are an integral part of the commercial and industrial
infrastructure of this state, and improving wastewater treatment  will promote economic
development and watershed health.
SECTION 21. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $10 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for  deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws  2017, for distribution to South Suburban Sanitary
District for wastewater treatment plant upgrades.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 9
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
wastewater treatment plants are an integral part of  the commercial and industrial
infrastructure of this state, and improving wastewater treatment  will promote economic
development and watershed health.
SECTION 22. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $2,361,910 in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for  deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distribution to  the City of Hubbard to
increase the capacity of the city’s wastewater treatment plant.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
wastewater treatment systems  are an integral part of the commercial and industrial
infrastructure of this state, and improving wastewater treatment  will promote economic
development and watershed health.
SECTION 23.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $3 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for  deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under section 28, chapter  748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distribution to the City of Burns to
repair drainage and wastewater treatment infrastructure impacted by flooding.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
drainage and wastewater systems are an integral part of the  commercial and industrial
infrastructure of this state, and improving wastewater treatment  will promote economic
development and watershed health.
SECTION 24. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $3 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for  deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distribution to Harney  County to mini-
mize flooding through the repair and improvement of infrastructure. This includes work  on
dikes and levees as well as dredging and vegetation thinning along waterways.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 10
reducing flooding risk is important for protecting the  economic viability of the region, cre-
ating jobs and improving the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 25. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $5 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund  established
under section 28, chapter  748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distribution to the City of John Day to
construct a new wastewater treatment plant.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
wastewater treatment systems are an integral part of the commercial  and industrial
infrastructure of this state,  and improving wastewater treatment will promote economic
development and watershed health.
SECTION 26. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $4 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund  established
under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon  Laws 2017, for distribution to the City of Adair Village
to increase the capacity of the city’s wastewater treatment plant.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
wastewater treatment systems  are an integral part of the commercial and industrial
infrastructure of this state, and improving wastewater treatment  will promote economic
development and watershed health.
SECTION 27. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the City of
Gresham, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $8 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the City of Gresham for construction of  a new fire
station.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
fire stations are necessary components of a  climate that facilitates and encourages economic
development.
SECTION 28. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Central
Oregon Intergovernmental Council, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue lottery bonds
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 11
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $10 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS  461.553, for distribution to the Central Oregon Intergovernmental Council for
construction of the CORE3 emergency coordination center and public safety  training facility.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
emergency coordination center and public safety training facilities are necessary components
of a climate that facilitates and encourages economic development.
SECTION 29. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the McMinnville
Fire District,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585  in an amount that produces $3 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the McMinnville Fire District for construction of a new
fire station.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
fire stations are necessary components of a  climate that facilitates and encourages economic
development.
SECTION 30.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with Lane County, the
State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585
in an amount that produces  $14.5 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in sub-
section (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State Treasurer to be
necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS  461.553, for distribution to Lane County for construction of a behavioral health
stabilization center.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
behavioral health centers are necessary components of a climate that facilitates and  en-
courages economic development.
SECTION 31. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  Columbia Me-
morial Hospital, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585  in an amount that produces $6 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to Columbia Memorial Hospital for expansion of the hos-
pital.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 12
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
hospitals are necessary components of a climate that facilitates  and encourages economic
development.
SECTION 32. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with Deschutes
County, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $3,081,813 in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to Deschutes County for  construction of a child psychi-
atric facility in central Oregon.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
child psychiatric facilities are an important part of the behavioral health system and  are
necessary components of a climate that facilitates and encourages economic development.
SECTION 33. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  Mosaic Commu-
nity Health, the State Treasurer is authorized to  issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to Mosaic Community Health for construction  of a health
care campus that includes primary care and other services.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
health care facilities are necessary components of a climate that  facilitates and encourages
economic development.
SECTION 34. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Santiam
Hospital and Clinics Foundation, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4,707,668 in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Santiam Hospital and Clinics Foundation for the
construction of a new  ambulance facility that includes sleeping and training space for am-
bulance crews.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
hospital and clinic  infrastructure such as ambulance facilities are necessary components of
a climate that facilitates and encourages economic development.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 13
SECTION 35. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Mittleman
Jewish Community Center, the State Treasurer is authorized to  issue lottery bonds pursuant
to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in  an amount that produces $4 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Mittleman Jewish Community Center for address-
ing deferred maintenance and enhancing the accessibility of the pool area. Additionally, the
proceeds may be used for renovations to expand childcare on-site.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
community centers with public  recreation facilities and childcare services support the long-
term economic development and livability of this state.
SECTION 36.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with Marion  Polk
Food Share, Inc., the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to  ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $6 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to Marion Polk Food Share, Inc., for acquiring  property
to allow for a larger warehouse and production kitchen.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
food banks enhance the economic  viability of the region and improve the quality of life for
the community.
SECTION 37. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the City of
Happy Valley, the State Treasurer  is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the  City of Happy Valley for constructing a community
recreation center.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
community centers and public recreation  facilities enhance the economic viability of the re-
gion, create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 38. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Willamette
Falls Trust, the State Treasurer  is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $45 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 14
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Willamette Falls Trust for acquiring property  and
funding construction and improvements to restore, develop and  provide public access to the
Willamette Falls site.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
providing public access to Willamette Falls will enhance the economic viability of the region
through increased tourism, additional opportunities  for education and recreation, increased
supply of public park lands and improved quality of life for the community.
SECTION 39.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with the Corvallis
School District, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for  distribution to the Corvallis School District for the renovation and
structural rehabilitation of the Osborn Aquatic Center.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
aquatic centers enhance the economic viability of the region, create jobs and improve  the
quality of life for the community.
SECTION 40.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  James Beard
Public Market, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $10 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the James Beard Public Market for the creation of  a
public market in Portland.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
public markets enhance the economic  viability of the region, create jobs and improve the
quality of life for the community.
SECTION 41.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with the Warm
Springs Community Action Team, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560  to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3.8 million in net pro-
ceeds for the purposes described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Warm Springs Community Action  Team to develop
a community space that will include a small business incubator, food cart pavilion and  com-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 15
mercial kitchen based  around the historic Commissary building on the Warm Springs Res-
ervation.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
community spaces enhance the economic viability of  the region, create jobs and improve the
quality of life for the community.
SECTION 42. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Union
County Fair Association, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant
to ORS  286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $2.5 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Union County Fair Association to make  improve-
ments to the Union County Fairgrounds’ water and sewer systems.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
fairgrounds enhance the economic viability of the region, create  jobs and improve the quality
of life for the community.
SECTION 43. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585  in an amount that produces $3.225 million in net pro-
ceeds for the purposes described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for  deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distribution to the City of Sherwood  to
extend the existing Brookman trunk sewer line.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
sewer systems are an integral part of the commercial and industrial infrastructure of this
state, and improving wastewater treatment will promote economic  development and
watershed health.
SECTION 44.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2025, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $3 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for  deposit in the OBDD Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distribution to the Confederated  Tribes
of Warm Springs for work on the existing drinking water treatment plant filtration system.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
safe drinking water is an integral  part of the commercial and industrial infrastructure of
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 16
this state, and improving water treatment will promote economic development and
watershed health.
SECTION 45.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Department
of Transportation, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $45 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of Transportation for deposit in the DOT  Economic Development Distributions
Fund established under ORS 461.557, for distribution to the Hood River-White Salmon Bridge
Authority to support the Hood River-White Salmon Interstate Bridge replacement project.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
a safe, efficient  and reliable transportation infrastructure supports the long-term economic
development and livability of this state.
SECTION 46. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2027, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the Department
of Transportation, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $30 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Department of Transportation for  deposit in the DOT Economic Development Distributions
Fund established under ORS 461.557, for distribution to the Hood River-White Salmon Bridge
Authority to support the Hood River-White Salmon Interstate Bridge replacement project.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
a safe, efficient and reliable transportation infrastructure supports the  long-term economic
development and livability of this state.
SECTION 47. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2029, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Department
of Transportation, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $30 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of Transportation for deposit in the DOT  Economic Development Distributions
Fund established under ORS 461.557, for distribution to the Hood River-White Salmon Bridge
Authority to support the Hood River-White Salmon Interstate Bridge replacement project.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
a safe, efficient  and reliable transportation infrastructure supports the long-term economic
development and livability of this state.
SECTION 48. Section 45, chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by section 6, chapter
104, Oregon Laws 2024, is repealed.
SECTION 49. (1) Prior to requesting the issuance of lottery bonds pursuant to this 2025
Act, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  review each authorized use of
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 17
lottery bond proceeds and determine whether the recipient is ready  to expend the proceeds
for the authorized use.
(2) If the department  determines that a recipient is not ready to expend the proceeds for
an authorized use, the State Treasurer may not issue lottery bonds under this 2025  Act for
the authorized use.
SECTION 50. Section 10, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009, as  amended by section 5, chapter 624,
Oregon Laws 2011, section 14, chapter 812, Oregon  Laws 2015, section 6, chapter 671, Oregon Laws
2019, section 8, chapter  682, Oregon Laws 2021, and section 40, chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2023, is
amended to read:
Sec. 10.  [ (1)] The Water Resources Department Water  Supply Fund is established separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys deposited in  the Water Resources De-
partment Water  Supply Fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund consists of lottery bond
proceeds, interest credited to the fund and  any other moneys deposited in or transferred to
the fund.  Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated to the Water Resources Department
for grants, loans and other expenditures related to the water supply .
[(2) The Water Resources Department Water Supply Fund consists of: ]
[(a) Net proceeds  of lottery bonds issued pursuant to sections 8 and 9, chapter 906, Oregon Laws
2009, deposited into the Water Resources Department Water Supply Fund for the following purposes: ]
[(A) $2,500,000 for the purposes of issuing grants to develop Umatilla Basin critical  ground water
storage projects  described in section 17, chapter 907, Oregon Laws 2009, and to provide or pay for
services in connection with those projects. ]
[(B) $217,000 to pay for the operation of  loan and grant programs under sections 18 to 27, chapter
907, Oregon Laws 2009. ]
[(C) $283,000 for the purpose of developing  an integrated state water resources strategy to imple-
ment the state water resources policy pursuant to ORS 536.220 and  section 45, chapter 907, Oregon
Laws 2009.]
[(D) $500,000 for purposes of the  grant program established by section 1, chapter 13, Oregon Laws
2008.]
[(b) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to section 4, chapter 624, Oregon  Laws 2011, in
an amount sufficient to provide $1,229,052 in net proceeds  and interest earnings for the department to
finance grants for feasibility studies for water conservation, reuse and storage projects. ]
[(c) $11 million in net proceeds and interest earnings pursuant to section 13,  chapter 812, Oregon
Laws 2015, to develop and implement water storage systems and delivery  infrastructure, implement
conservation and reuse projects or provide access to new water supplies. ]
[(d) $750,000 in net proceeds and interest  earnings pursuant to section 13, chapter 812, Oregon
Laws 2015, to provide grants for place-based planning. ]
[(e) $1 million  in net proceeds and interest earnings pursuant to section 13, chapter 812, Oregon
Laws 2015, to repair, replace or remediate water wells in the Mosier Creek area. ]
[(f) $14 million in net proceeds pursuant to section 4, chapter 671, Oregon  Laws 2019, as amended
by section 6, chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021, for remediation of the Big Creek  Dams, including design,
environmental permitting and construction of a seismically sound replacement dam. ]
[(g) $14 million in net proceeds  pursuant to section 5, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended
by section 7, chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021, for rehabilitation of the Wallowa Lake Dam. ]
[(h) $5 million in  net proceeds pursuant to section 26 of this 2023 Act, to replace the City of West
Linn drinking water pipe over the Willamette River. ]
[(i) Any other fees, revenues or income deposited in the fund by the Legislative Assembly. ]
SECTION 51.  Section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended  by section 32, chapter
671, Oregon Laws 2019, section  13, chapter 5, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), section
53, chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021, and section 39, chapter 599, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended  to
read:
Sec. 28.  (1) The OBDD Economic Development Distributions  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys in the OBDD
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 18
Economic Development Distributions Fund must be  credited to the fund. [ The OBDD Economic De-
velopment Distributions Fund consists of  moneys deposited in the fund under sections 26 and 27,
chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, and sections 21, 22, 23,  35 and 36 of this 2023 Act, and may include
fees, revenues or other income deposited into  the fund by the Legislative Assembly. ] The fund consists
of lottery bond proceeds  appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department for
further distribution to  public or private entities that do not receive appropriations directly
from the Legislative Assembly and of interest credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for purposes described in [ sections 26 and 27, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017,  and sections
21, 22, 23, 35 and 36 of this 2023 Act. ] subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 52. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5531 (SB 5531-A) Page 19